Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201281-8,200.02
Professional development programs;
rules and regulations.

The board shall
adopt and promulgate rules and regulations as are necessary for the
effective delivery and licensure of all programs
of professional development required in section 81-8,200.01.

Laws 1984, LB 477, § 13;

Laws 2012, LB1140, § 18.
July 19, 2012